Missouri, session 2026, HB1734.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 640, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 640.900, to read as follows:
640.900. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Soil Erosion
Control Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly; all
gifts, grants, and bequests from any federal or private source; and all repayment of loan
moneys from eligible homeowners' associations. The state treasurer shall be custodian
of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
2. The fund shall be used to better equip neighborhoods and communities to
reduce sedimentation and erosion of creeks, streams, and waterways, and to protect
ecological integrity and environmental services provided by natural drainage channels
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1734 2
that run in close proximity to residential areas. The following types of projects are
eligible for loan funds:
(1) Daylighting waterways;
(2) Adding or restoring natural flood and catchment capacity to existing
waterways;
(3) Restoring or rehabilitating natural culverts or culverts that use natural
infrastructure;
(4) Bank stabilization using natural means such as vegetation, trees, or built
implements as long as such implements do not compromise the natural functionality of
the creek, stream, or waterway; and
(5) Any other project deemed eligible by the department.
3. The following projects shall not be eligible for loans under this section:
(1) Lining drainage-ways with impermeable surfaces; and
(2) Deploying impermeable surfaces throughout a creek, stream, or waterway
that covers large swaths of natural area.
4. To be eligible for a loan under this section, a homeowners' association shall be
incorporated as a nonprofit organization under Missouri law.
5. The department of natural resources shall distribute moneys from the fund
according to rules and regulations promulgated under this section. The distribution
shall also be subject to the following:
(1) The interest amount on loans granted under this section shall not exceed the
federal funds rate or two percent, whichever is greater;
(2) The loan amount shall not exceed eighty percent of the total cost of a project
in a single fiscal year;
(3) The terms of the loan shall include a repayment schedule of not more than
ten years; and
(4) A homeowners' association shall:
(a) Pass an assessment to the homeowners before qualifying for a loan under this
section. The assessment shall be documented in the minutes of a homeowners'
association meeting, indicating the meeting was held with appropriate notice, a quorum
was present, and a vote for the assessment was favorable; and
(b) As loan collateral, place liens or contingent liens upon all property where
improvements from the project abut or are wholly within the property.
6. The department shall establish an application form for homeowners'
associations to apply for loans under this section that shall, at a minimum, require
homeowners' associations to certify their compliance with the requirements of this

HB 1734 3
section and provide any other information the department deems necessary for its
decision to award funds.
7. The director may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔